Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-3,162
Certificate of registration; improper issuance; revocation.

(1) The department shall, upon a sworn complaint in writing of any person, investigate whether a certificate of registration:

(a) Has been issued on a motor vehicle or trailer that exceeds the length, height, or width provided by law;

(b) Was issued contrary to any law of this state; or

(c) Was issued to a person who has had a certificate of registration revoked pursuant to subdivision (1)(c) of section 60-3,183 under the International Registration Plan Act.

(2) If the department validates the information in the complaint after conducting such investigation, it shall have the power to revoke such certificate of registration.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 162;

Laws 2019, LB270, § 24;

Laws 2024, LB1200, § 18.

International Registration Plan Act, see section 60-3,192.